


















Compensation - FindLaw






























 FindLaw For Legal Professionals 

Not a Legal Professional? Visit our consumer site  

Register | Login
Welcome.Edit Your Profile | Log Out
Javascript is disabled. Please enable Javascript to log in.





Menu
Search



Cases & Codes
Practice Management
Jobs & Careers
Newsletters
Blogs
Law Technology










Forms
Lawyer Marketing
Corporate Counsel
Law Students
JusticeMail
Reference

























FindLaw
 Corporate Counsel

 Contracts

Compensation 


Compensation Business Contracts



Search Corporate Counsel Center




        Enter keyword:
        










Benefit Plans (44)


Consulting Agreements (84)


Deferred Compensation Plans (114)


Director Stock Plans (78)


Employee Stock Plans (305)


Employment Agreements (1393)


Incentive Plans (288)


Labor Agreements (3)


Management Stock Plans (17)


Noncompetition Agreements (25)


Retirement Plans (101)


Severance Agreements (269)


























FindLaw Career Center


Select a Job Title



Attorney
Corporate Counsel
Academic
Judicial Clerk
Summer Associate
Intern
Law Librarian
Paralegal
Legal Secretary
Law Enforcement
District Attorney
Legal Investigator
Compliance Officer
Investment Banker
Business Development



            Post a Job  |  Careers Home 



View More





















































College & Higher Education Pathways | Encyclopedia.com





















      Skip to main content
    
















Search












Research categories





Research categories


Earth and Environment


History


Literature and the Arts


Medicine


People


Philosophy and Religion


Places


Plants and Animals


Science and Technology


Social Sciences and the Law


Sports and Everyday Life


Additional References



























































College & Higher Education Pathways















Nursing Programs






Criminal Justice Degrees






Business Degrees






Psychology Degree Online






Education






All Degrees & Programs























Where to start

Making the decision going to college, pursuing an advanced degree or obtaining an industry recognized certificate is one of the most important decisions an individual will make in their lifetime. When considering an educational institution there are numerous factors that need to be taken into account before an education decision can be made. 
Here are the main factors to consider when looking at pursuing an advanced degree or completing a certificate program:
Online VS In Person: This is the first fundamental question that prospective students need to ask themselves. If you are the kind of person that is self driven, has a tight schedule or is not in a commutable distance to an in person institution, then pursuing an online degree could be a good fit. However, if you find yourself needing to be in a physical classroom environment and learn better that way, then you should seek out in person programs that can better suite your needs. People learn in all different kinds of ways. Some are visual learners, some experiential and some need to hear things to have the information really sink in. No one knows himself or herself better than you, so listen to your gut and first determine what kind of learner you are before embarking on the next steps. Rasmssen College goes into greater depth about the plusses and minuses of online v.s. traditional educational settings. 
Career Opportunities: When exploring areas of study that you are interested in, one recommendation is to first explore the types of jobs and careers in that industry. Often times people find that after obtaining a degree that has set them back a significant amount of money, that the career field that they have their degree in is either not growing or is underpaid in relation to the cost of the degree. We suggest exploring a variety of careers and use the information contained here in conjunction with The Bureau of Labor and Statistics Data to determine if you are making a wise investment in your degree. All of the statistics we have assembled on career and degree data come from the BLS website and are intended to help students make wise decisions about their studies and career options with a degree or certificate. 



 
Time Commitment: The amount of time that you have available to apply to your studies is going to be one of the most important factors in your decision. If you are working a full time job, you will have to figure out a way of balancing your personal life, with your schoolwork. This article from US News and World Report will help you come up with a game plan for managing your time
Financial Aid, Scholarships and Student Loans: Once you have decided that you want to go to college and have a career path planned out once you obtain your degree, then it’s time to figure out how to pay for the degree. Most institutions have different financing options that you will have to do your homework on, but all usually have some form of financial aid or scholarships available. When looking for information on student aid and the resources available to students, we recommend starting at the Federal Student Aid website. This is an office of the U.S. Department of Education and here, students will find a wealth of resources and information that will help them better determine what kind of aid or grants are available to them.























Student Financial Aid










Popular College Degrees and Programs
Online Education DegreesTraining Certificate OnlineBachelors in EducationOnline Masters in EducationDoctorate in EducationGraduate Certificates in EducationAlternative Teacher CertificationOnline Teaching DegreeEarly Childhood EducationElementary Education DegreeOnline Secondary Education DegreeAdult Education ProgramsAll Education Degrees








































2009 SIIA CODiE WINNER Best Online General Reference Service
2010 SIIA CODiE WINNER Best Online Consumer Information Service











































Contracts - FindLaw






























 FindLaw For Legal Professionals 

Not a Legal Professional? Visit our consumer site  

Register | Login
Welcome.Edit Your Profile | Log Out
Javascript is disabled. Please enable Javascript to log in.





Menu
Search



Cases & Codes
Practice Management
Jobs & Careers
Newsletters
Blogs
Law Technology










Forms
Lawyer Marketing
Corporate Counsel
Law Students
JusticeMail
Reference

























FindLaw
 Corporate Counsel

Contracts


Browse Contracts by Company Name
Trying to draft a contract and not sure where to begin? Have you been sent a contract and you want to compare it to something similar? The Sample Contracts section of FindLaw’s Corporate Counsel Center can help. FindLaw provides free access to a large archive of sample contracts from public companies that cover a variety of practice areas. You can search by type, such as compensation, finance, business formation, intellectual property licenses, business planning, business operations, corporate, or securities. You can also search by industry, such as consumer products, drugs and biotech, real estate, or technology, to name just a few. Get started below by searching by company name. Let FindLaw’s Sample Contracts help you find the right solution!



Apple Computer Inc.


AT&T Corp.


Raytheon Co.


Exxon Mobil Corp.


H&R Block Inc.


Microsoft Corp.


WebMD Corp.


Coca-Cola Co.


View more »





Browse Contracts by Type
In this section, you will find numerous contracts grouped by contract type. For instance, if you need sample forms or contracts related to compensation, business operations or even mergers, FindLaw has the information. In this section, you will find numerous templates organized in a user-friendly format. Click the links below to browse our extensive collection and to learn more about the right form for you.



Compensation


Employment


Stock Options


Severance


Finance


Credit


Loans


Warrants


Business Formation


Bylaws


Incorp.


LLCs


Intellectual Property Licences


Business Planning


Mergers


Spin-offs


Stock Purchase


Business Operations


Real Estate


Sales


Services


Corporate


Governance


Indemnification


Nondisclosure


Securities


Shareholder Agreements


Registration Rights





Browse Contracts by Industry

Below, are some of the most commonly used business forms and contracts, organized by industry. You'll find contracts for sales, employment, leases, and other business contracts such as a franchise agreement or stock purchase agreement. Click the links to browse our extensive collection and to learn more about the right form for your business needs.



Consumer Products


Personal Care


Furniture


Toys


Drugs & Biotech


Biotech


Pharmaceuticals


Energy


Exploration


Services


Refining


Financial Services


Banks


Credit Agencies


Securities


Food and Beverages


Beverages


Diversified Foods


Meat Products


Health Care


Health Plans


Devices


Services


Insurance


Accident and Health


Life


Property


Manufacturing


Conglomerates


Industrial


Paper


Media


Books


Newspapers


Radio and TV


Real Estate


Agents


REITs


Operators


Retail


Electronics


Food


Books


Services


Advertising


Legal


Consulting


Technology


Hardware


Software


Semiconductors


Telecommunications


Comm. Equipment


Telephone Services


Transportation


Autos


Railroads


Airlines


Travel and Entertainment


Recreation


Lodging


Utilities


Electric


Gas


Sanitary


More Industries


Construction


Materials


Aerospace





Sample Contracts by Company Name
Below, you'll find a large collection of industry-standard real-life examples of business forms and contracts for a wide variety of topics, alphabetically arranged by company name. Click on a letter or number below to find sample contracts from an extensive range of companies.




1
2
3
4
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z


























FindLaw Career Center


Select a Job Title



Attorney
Corporate Counsel
Academic
Judicial Clerk
Summer Associate
Intern
Law Librarian
Paralegal
Legal Secretary
Law Enforcement
District Attorney
Legal Investigator
Compliance Officer
Investment Banker
Business Development



            Post a Job  |  Careers Home 



View More





















































Stock Option Agreement - Medical Manager Corp. and Martin J. Wygod - FindLaw






























 FindLaw For Legal Professionals 

Not a Legal Professional? Visit our consumer site  

Register | Login
Welcome.Edit Your Profile | Log Out
Javascript is disabled. Please enable Javascript to log in.





Menu
Search



Cases & Codes
Practice Management
Jobs & Careers
Newsletters
Blogs
Law Technology










Forms
Lawyer Marketing
Corporate Counsel
Law Students
JusticeMail
Reference

























FindLaw
 Corporate Counsel

 Contracts

 Compensation

Stock Option Agreement - Medical Manager Corp. and Martin J. Wygod 



Stock Option Agreement - Medical Manager Corp. and Martin J. Wygod









                  AMENDED AND RESTATED STOCK OPTION AGREEMENT dated as of August
21, 2000 (the "Agreement") between MEDICAL MANAGER CORPORATION, a Delaware
corporation (the "Company"), and MARTIN J. WYGOD (the "Participant").

                  WHEREAS, in light of the extraordinary services that will be
required of the Participant in integrating the businesses of the companies
following the merger of the Company and CareInsite, Inc., a Delaware
corporation, with Healtheon/WebMD Corporation, a Delaware corporation
("Healtheon"), the Company has granted to the Participant nonqualified stock
options to purchase 1,200,000 shares of common stock, $.01 par value, of the
Company (the "Common Shares") upon the terms and conditions hereinafter set
forth;

                  NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the covenants and
agreements herein contained, the parties hereto agree as follows:

                  1.       Confirmation of Grant of Options; Effectiveness.
Pursuant to a determination by the Stock Option Committee (the "Committee") of
the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board"), the Company hereby confirms
that the Participant has been granted, effective as of the date hereof (the
"Date of Grant"), and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the
number of nonqualified stock options (the "Options") specified at the foot of
the signature page hereof. Each such Option shall entitle the Participant to
purchase, upon payment of the option price specified at the foot of the
signature page hereof (the "Option Price"), one Common Share. The Options shall
be exercisable as hereinafter provided.

                  2.       Certain Restrictions. None of the Options may be
sold, transferred, assigned, pledged, or otherwise encumbered or disposed of,
except by will or the laws of descent and distribution; provided, however, that
the Committee shall permit the transfer of an Option to the Participant's family
members, to one or more trusts established in whole or in part for the benefit
of one or more of such family members or to any other entity that is owned by
such family members. During the Participant's lifetime, an Option shall be
exercisable only by the Participant or by the Participant's guardian, legal
representative or permitted transferee. Each transferee of an Option by will or
the laws of descent and distribution or other permitted transferee shall, as a
condition to the transfer thereof, execute an agreement pursuant to which it
shall become a party to this Agreement. Any attempt to sell, transfer, assign,
pledge or otherwise encumber or dispose of any Option contrary to the provisions
of this Agreement, and any levy, attachment or similar process upon any Option
shall be null and void and without effect.

                  3.       Terms and Conditions of Options. The Options
evidenced hereby are subject to the following terms and conditions:

                  (a)      Vesting. Subject to Section 3(b), the Options shall
vest and become exercisable ("Vested Options") as follows: 2.0833% of the
Options shall vest and become exercisable on the first day of each month
following the Date of Grant, commencing September 1, 2000, with 100% of the
Options being vested and exercisable on August 1, 2004.


>PAGE>   3

                  (b)      Option Period. (i) The Options shall not be
exercisable following the tenth anniversary of the Date of Grant, and shall be
subject to earlier termination as provided in Section 3(b)(iii).

                  (ii) In the event that the Participant's employment with the
Company and its subsidiaries is terminated (A) as a result of the Participant's
death or the Participant becoming Disabled (as defined below), (B) by the
Company without Cause (as defined below) or (C) by the Participant for Good
Reason (as defined below), the Options shall be fully vested and exercisable as
of the date on which such employment terminates.

                  (iii) In the event that the Participant's employment with the
Company and its subsidiaries is terminated by the Company for Cause or by the
Participant without Good Reason, any Options which have not become Vested
Options as of the date of termination shall terminate and be cancelled without
any consideration being paid therefor; provided, however, that a change in the
Participant's status with the Surviving Corporation (as defined in the Agreement
and Plan of Merger dated February 13, 2000 between Healtheon and the Company, as
amended by Amendment No. 1 thereto dated as of June 18, 2000 (the "Merger
Agreement")) from Co-Chief Executive Officer or Chief Executive Officer to any
other position (including Chairman) with the consent of the Surviving
Corporation and the Participant shall not be treated as a termination of the
Participant's employment for purposes of this Agreement.

                  (iv) In the event that the Participant's employment with the
Company and its subsidiaries terminates for any reason, the Participant (or the
Participant's estate) shall be entitled to exercise any Options which have
become Vested Options as of the date of termination until the tenth anniversary
of the Date of Grant.

                  (v) In the event of a Change in Control (as defined below),
the Options shall be fully vested and exercisable as of the date on which such
Change in Control occurs. For purposes of this Agreement, a "Change in Control"
means a transaction (other than the transactions contemplated by the Merger
Agreement) that occurs after the Effective Time (as defined in the Merger
Agreement), if:

                  1.       Any person, entity or group shall have acquired, in
         one or more transactions, the beneficial ownership of at least 50
         percent of the voting power of the outstanding voting securities of the
         Surviving Corporation; or

                  2.       The sale of all or substantially all of the assets of
         the Surviving Corporation to a person, entity or group occurs in a
         transaction (except for a sale-leaseback transaction) where the
         Surviving Corporation or the holders of the common stock of the
         Surviving Corporation do not receive (i) voting securities representing
         a majority of the voting power entitled to vote on a regular basis for
         the board of directors of the acquiring entity or of an affiliate which
         controls the acquiring entity, or (ii) securities representing a
         majority of the equity interest in the acquiring entity or of an
         affiliate that controls the acquiring entity, if other than a
         corporation; or

                  3.       A complete liquidation or dissolution of the
         Surviving Corporation shall have occurred;


                                       2
>PAGE>   4

         provided, however, that the provisions of this clause (v) shall be
         subject to any necessary approvals by the Committee.

                  (c)      Certain Definitions. (i) For purposes of this
Agreement, "Cause" means a final, non-appealable court adjudication in a civil
or criminal proceeding that the Participant has during his employment committed
a fraud or felony directed against the Company relating to or adversely
affecting his employment.

                  (ii) For purposes of this Agreement, the Participant shall be
"Disabled" if the Participant becomes incapacitated by bodily injury or disease
(including as a result of mental illness) so as to be unable to regularly
perform the duties of his position for a period in excess of 180 days in any
consecutive twelve-month period.

                  (iii) For purposes of this Agreement, "Good Reason" means any
of the following conditions or events:

                  1.       a reduction in the Participant's title or
         responsibilities with the Company or the Surviving Corporation, or if
         he is required to report to any person other than the full Board
         (following the Effective Time, the full Board of Directors of the
         Surviving Corporation);

                  2.       any reduction in any compensation or fringe benefits
         provided by the Company;

                  3.       any breach by the Company of this Agreement or any
         other material agreement between the Company and the Participant;

                  4.       the failure of the Surviving Corporation to assume
         the obligations of the Company hereunder and agree to be bound by the
         terms hereof; or

                  5.       a change in the location from which the Participant
         performs his services for the Company or the Surviving Corporation from
         his residence in the San Diego, California area.

                  (d)      Notice of Exercise. Subject to Sections 3(e) and 5(a)
hereof, the Participant may exercise any or all of the Vested Options by giving
written notice to the Chief Financial Officer of the Company at its principal
business office. The date of exercise of a Vested Option shall be the later of
(i) the date on which the Chief Financial Officer of the Company receives such
written notice or (ii) the date on which the conditions provided in Sections
3(e) and 5(a) hereof are satisfied.

                  (e)      Payment. Prior to the issuance of a certificate
pursuant to Section 3(h) hereof evidencing Common Shares, the Participant shall
have paid to the Company the Option Price of all Common Shares purchased
pursuant to exercise of such Options, in cash or by certified or official bank
check, and all applicable tax withholding obligations as provided in Section
5(a) of this Agreement. The Option Price may also be payable by a customary
"cashless" exercise procedure through a broker or in such other form as the
Committee may approve.


                                       3
>PAGE>   5

                  (f)      Shareholder Rights. The Participant shall have no
rights as a shareholder with respect to any Common Shares issuable upon the
exercise of an Option until a certificate or certificates evidencing such shares
shall have been issued to the Participant, and, except as provided in Section 6,
no adjustment shall be made for dividends or distributions or other rights in
respect of any share for which the record date is prior to the date upon which
the Participant shall become the holder of record thereof.

                  (g)      Compliance with Securities Laws. The Company shall,
on or prior to the date on which an Option becomes exercisable, use its best
efforts to (A) file a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange
Commission on Form S-8 with respect to the Common Shares subject to such Option
and cause such registration statement to be declared effective and remain
effective for so long as any Option remains outstanding and (B) qualify such
Common Shares under applicable state "blue sky" laws (or determine that an
exemption under such blue sky laws is available) and cause such Common Shares to
remain so qualified (or exempt) for so long as any Option remains outstanding.

                  (h)      Issuance of Certificate. As soon as practicable
following the exercise of any Options, a certificate evidencing the number of
Common Shares issued in connection with such exercise shall be issued in the
name of the Participant.

                  4.       Representations and Warranties. The Company and the
Participant represent that this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered
by such party and constitutes a legal, valid and binding agreement of such
party, enforceable against such party in accordance with its terms, except as
limited by any applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or
similar law affecting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of
equity.

                  5.       Miscellaneous.

                  (a)      Tax Withholding. The Company and its subsidiaries
shall have the right to require the Participant to remit to the Company, prior
to the delivery of any certificates evidencing Common Shares pursuant to the
exercise of an Option, any amount sufficient to satisfy any minimum federal,
state or local tax withholding requirements. Prior to the Company's
determination of such withholding liability, the Participant shall have the
right to make an irrevocable election to satisfy, in whole or in part, such
obligation to remit taxes by directing the Company to withhold Common Shares
that would otherwise be received by the Participant.

                  (b)      No Restriction on Right of Company to Effect
Corporate Changes. Subject to Section 6, this Agreement shall not affect in any
way the right or power of the Company or its stockholders to make or authorize
any or all adjustments, recapitalizations, reorganizations or other changes in
the capital structure or business of the Company, or any merger or consolidation
of the Company, or any issue of stock or of options, warrants or rights to
purchase stock or of bonds, debentures, preferred or prior preference stocks
whose rights are superior to or affect the Common Shares or the rights thereof
or which are convertible into or exchangeable for Common Shares, or the
dissolution or liquidation of the Company, or any sale


                                       4
>PAGE>   6

or transfer of all or any part of the assets or business of the Company, or any
other corporate act or proceeding, whether of a similar character or otherwise.

                  6.       Adjustment.

                  The number and price per Common Share covered by any Option,
and any other rights under any Option, shall be appropriately adjusted by the
Board or the Committee, as the case may be, to reflect any subdivision (stock
split) or consolidation (reverse split) of the issued Common Shares, or any
other recapitalization of the Company, or any business combination or other
transaction involving the Company (including, without limitation, rights
offerings and issuances of securities for consideration that is less than the
fair market value thereof), which shall affect the rights of holders of Common
Shares. The Committee or the Board, as the case may be, shall provide for
appropriate adjustment of the Options in the event of stock dividends or
distributions of assets or securities owned by the Company to its stockholders.
Without limiting the foregoing, any adjustment pursuant to this Section 6 shall
(i) be on terms that are no less favorable to the Participant than those
applicable to any other holder of stock options or convertible securities issued
by the Company and (ii) entitle the Participant to receive, upon exercise of the
Options, in addition to the Common Shares that remain subject to such Options,
such stock, securities, other property and rights that the Participant, as a
holder of Common Shares, would have received if such Options had been exercised
prior to the date of the applicable event or transaction described in this
Section 6.

                  7.       Survival; Assignment.

                  All agreements, representations and warranties made herein and
in any certificates delivered pursuant hereto shall survive the issuance to the
Participant of the Options and the Common Shares and, notwithstanding any
investigation heretofore or hereafter made by the Participant or the Company or
on the Participant's or the Company's behalf, shall continue in full force and
effect. Without the prior written consent of the Company, the Participant may
not assign any of his rights hereunder except as permitted by Section 2.
Whenever in this Agreement any of the parties hereto is referred to, such
reference shall be deemed to include the heirs and permitted successors and
assigns of such party; and all agreements herein by or on behalf of the Company,
or by or on behalf of the Participant, shall bind and inure to the benefit of
the heirs and permitted successors and assigns of such parties hereto.

                  8.       Gross-Up Payment. (i) Anything in this Agreement to
the contrary or any termination of the Options notwithstanding, in the event it
shall be determined that any payment or distribution or benefit received or to
be received by the Participant pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any
other payment or distribution or benefit made or provided by the Company, or any
of its subsidiaries and affiliates, to or for the benefit of the Participant
(whether pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise and determined without regard
to any additional payments required under this Section 8) (a "Payment") would be
subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended (the "Code") or any interest or penalties are incurred by
the Participant with respect to such excise tax (such excise tax, together with
any such interest and penalties, is hereinafter collectively referred to as the
"Excise Tax"), then the Participant shall be entitled to receive an additional
payment (a "Gross-Up Payment") in an amount such that after payment by the
Participant of all taxes


                                       5
>PAGE>   7

(including any interest or penalties imposed with respect to such taxes),
including, without limitation, any income and employment taxes (and any interest
and penalties imposed with respect thereto) and Excise Tax imposed upon the
Gross-Up Payment, the Participant retains an amount of the Gross-Up Payment
equal to the sum of (x) the Excise Tax imposed upon the Payments and (y) the
product of any deductions actually disallowed under Section 68 of the Code
solely as a direct result of the inclusion of the Gross-Up Payment in the
Participant's adjusted gross income and the highest applicable marginal rate of
federal income taxation for the calendar year in which the Gross-Up Payment is
to be made. For purposes of determining the amount of the Gross-Up Payment, the
Participant shall be deemed to (i) pay federal income taxes at the highest
marginal rates of federal income taxation for the calendar year in which the
Gross-Up Payment is to be made and (ii) pay applicable state and local income
taxes at the highest marginal rate of taxation for the calendar year in which
the Gross-Up Payment is to be made, net of the maximum reduction in federal
income taxes which could be obtained from deduction of such state and local
taxes.

                  (ii) Subject to the provisions of Sections 8(i) and 8(iii),
all determinations required to be made under this Section 8, including whether
and when a Gross-Up Payment is required and the amount of such Gross-Up Payment
and the assumptions to be utilized in arriving at such determination, shall be
made by the Company's certified public accounting firm (the "Accounting Firm"),
which shall provide detailed supporting calculations both to the Company and the
Participant within 15 business days of the receipt of notice from the
Participant or the Company that there has been a Payment, or such earlier time
as is requested by the Company. All fees and expenses of the Accounting Firm
shall be borne solely by the Company. Any Gross-Up Payment, as determined
pursuant to this Section 8, shall be paid by the Company to the Participant
within five days of the receipt of the Accounting Firm's determination. Any
determination by the Accounting Firm shall be binding upon the Company and the
Participant. As a result of the uncertainty in the application of Section 4999
of the Code at the time of the initial determination by the Accounting Firm
hereunder, it is possible that Gross-Up Payments which will not have been made
by the Company should have been made ("Underpayment"), consistent with the
calculations required to be made hereunder. In the event that the Company
exhausts its remedies pursuant to Section 8(iii) and the Participant thereafter
is required to make a payment of any Excise Tax, the Accounting Firm shall
determine the amount of the Underpayment that has occurred and any such
Underpayment shall be promptly paid by the Company to or for the benefit of the
Participant.

                  (iii) The Participant shall notify the Company in writing of
any claim by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service (the "IRS") that, if successful,
would require the payment by the Company of the Gross-Up Payment. Such
notification shall be given as soon as practicable but no later than ten
business days after the Participant is informed in writing of such claim and
shall apprise the Company of the nature of such claim and the date on which such
claim is requested to be paid. The Participant shall not pay such claim prior to
the expiration of the 30-day period following the date on which the Participant
gives such notice to the Company (or such shorter period ending on the date that
any payment of taxes with respect to such claim is due). If the Company notifies
the Participant in writing prior to the expiration of such period that it
desires to contest such claim, the Participant shall:


                                       6
>PAGE>   8

                  (a)      give the Company any information reasonably requested
         by the Company relating to such claim;

                  (b)      take such action in connection with contesting such
         claim as the Company shall reasonably request in writing from time to
         time, including, without limitation, accepting legal representation
         with respect to such claim by an attorney reasonably selected by the
         Company; and

                  (c)      cooperate with the Company in good faith in order
         effectively to contest such claim;

provided, however, that the Company shall bear and pay directly all costs and
expenses (including additional interest and penalties) incurred in connection
with such contest and shall indemnify and hold the Participant harmless, on an
after-tax basis, for any Excise Tax or income and employment tax (including
interest and penalties with respect thereto) imposed as a result of such
representation and payment of costs and expenses. Without limitation on the
foregoing provisions of this Section 8(iii), the Company shall control all
proceedings taken in connection with such contest and, at its sole option, may
pursue or forgo any and all administrative appeals, proceedings, hearings and
conferences with the taxing authority in respect of such claim and may, at its
sole option, either direct the Participant to pay the tax claimed and sue for a
refund or contest the claim in any permissible manner, and the Participant shall
agree to prosecute such contest to a determination before any administrative
tribunal, in a court of initial jurisdiction and in one or more appellate
courts, as the Company shall determine; provided, however, that if the Company
directs the Participant to pay such claim and sue for a refund, the Company
shall advance the amount of such payment to the Participant, on an interest-free
basis and shall indemnify and hold the Participant harmless, on an after-tax
basis, from any Excise Tax or income and employment tax (including interest or
penalties with respect thereto) imposed with respect to such advance or with
respect to any imputed income with respect to such advance; and provided
further, that any extension of the statute of limitations relating to payment of
taxes for the taxable year of the Participant with respect to which such
contested amount is claimed to be due is limited solely to such contested
amount. Furthermore, the Company's control of the contest shall be limited to
issues with respect to which a Gross-Up Payment would be payable hereunder and
the Participant shall be entitled to settle or contest, as the case may be, any
other issue (an "Other Issue") raised by the IRS or any other taxing authority;
provided, however, that if, solely as a result of any contest by the Company
pursuant to this Section 8(iii), the Participant's ability to settle or
otherwise resolve any such Other Issue is delayed, then the Company will
reimburse the Participant, on an after-tax basis, for any additional interest
incurred by the Participant as a result of such delay.

                  (iv) If, after the receipt by the Participant of an amount
advanced by the Company pursuant to Section 8(iii), the Participant becomes
entitled to receive any refund with respect to such claim, the Participant shall
(subject to the Company's complying with the requirements of Section 8(iii))
promptly pay to the Company the amount of such refund (together with any
interest paid or credited thereon after taxes applicable thereto). If, after the
receipt by the Participant of an amount advanced by the Company pursuant to
Section 8(iii), a determination is made that the Participant shall not be
entitled to any refund with respect to such claim and the Company does not
notify the Participant in writing of its intent to contest such


                                       7
>PAGE>   9

denial of refund prior to the expiration of 30 days after such determination,
then such advance shall be forgiven and shall not be required to be repaid and
the amount of such advance shall offset, to the extent thereof, the amount of
Gross-Up Payment required to be paid.

                  9.       Consulting Engagement. In the event that the
Participant terminates his employment with the Company and its subsidiaries
without Good Reason after the six-month anniversary of the Effective Time but
prior to the third anniversary of the Effective Time, the Participant shall, at
the request of the Company, make himself available to provide consulting and
advisory services (the "Consulting Services") to the Company during the period
beginning on the date of termination and ending on the third anniversary of the
Effective Time; provided, however, that such Consulting Services shall be
performed at such times and places as are acceptable to the Participant in his
sole discretion. The Participant shall not be entitled to receive any additional
compensation for the Consulting Services.

                  10.      Notices. All notices and other communications
provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or sent
by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid,
addressed, if to the Participant, to his attention at the most recent mailing
address that the Company has on record and, if to the Company, to it at River
Drive Center 2, 669 River Drive, Elmwood Park, New Jersey 07407-1361, Telecopier
No.: (201) 703-3401, Attention: Chief Financial Officer. All such notices shall
be conclusively deemed to be received and shall be effective, if sent by hand
delivery, upon receipt, or if sent by registered or certified mail, on the fifth
day after the day on which such notice is mailed.

                  11.      Waiver. The waiver by either party of compliance with
any provision of this Agreement by the other party shall not operate or be
construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any
subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.

                  12.      Source of Rights. This Agreement shall be the sole
and exclusive source of any and all rights which the Participant, and the
Participant's personal representatives or heirs at law, may have in respect of
the Options as granted hereunder.

                  13.      Captions. The captions contained in this Agreement
are for reference purposes only and shall not affect the meaning or
interpretation of this Agreement.

                  14.      Entire Agreement; Governing Law; Jurisdiction. This
Agreement sets forth the entire agreement and understanding between the parties
hereto and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings relating to the
subject matter hereof (including, without limitation, the Stock Option Agreement
dated as of August 21, 2000 between the Company and the Participant). The
Participant and the Company acknowledge and agree that the terms and conditions
of the letter agreement dated June 18, 2000 between Healtheon and the
Participant shall not apply to the Options granted pursuant to this Agreement.
This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall
be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute
one and the same agreement. The headings of sections and subsections herein are
included solely for convenience of reference and shall not affect the meaning of
any of the provisions of this Agreement. This Agreement shall be governed by,
and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New Jersey (without


                                       8
>PAGE>   10

reference to the choice of law provisions of New Jersey law) applicable to
contracts executed and to be wholly performed within such State, and the State
or Federal court sitting in San Diego County, California shall have exclusive
jurisdiction of the Company and the Participant for purposes of adjudicating any
disputes under this Agreement. The Participant and the Company hereby consent to
personal jurisdiction and venue in the State or Federal court sitting in San
Diego County, California and hereby waive any claim or defense that the party
lacks minimum contacts with the forum, that such State or Federal court lacks
personal jurisdiction of the parties, or that such State or Federal court is an
improper or inconvenient venue.


                                       9
>PAGE>   11

                  IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this Agreement to
be executed by its duly authorized officer and the Participant has executed this
Agreement, both as of the day and year first above written.

                           MEDICAL MANAGER CORPORATION


                           By:                /s/ CHARLES A. MELE
                              --------------------------------------------------
                              Name: Charles A. Mele
                              Title: Executive Vice President - General Counsel

                           PARTICIPANT


                           /s/ MARTIN J. WYGOD
                           -----------------------------------------------------
                           Martin J. Wygod

Number of Options: 1,200,000

Option Price: $31.875


                                       10



































FindLaw Career Center


Select a Job Title



Attorney
Corporate Counsel
Academic
Judicial Clerk
Summer Associate
Intern
Law Librarian
Paralegal
Legal Secretary
Law Enforcement
District Attorney
Legal Investigator
Compliance Officer
Investment Banker
Business Development



            Post a Job  |  Careers Home 



View More






































WBMD Martin J. Wygod Insider Trades for WebMD Health Corp.


































Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































WebMD Health Corp.

                  NASDAQ: WBMD
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

WebMD Health Corp.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 28, 2017, 6:20 p.m.


WBMD

/quotes/zigman/98206/composite


$
66.21




Change

+0.03
+0.04%

Volume
Volume 7,826
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/98206/composite
Previous close

$
			66.20
		


$
				66.18
			
Change

-0.02
-0.03%





Day low
Day high
$66.17
$66.24










52 week low
52 week high

            $48.10
        

            $66.34
        


















Insider Activity


Individual




Martin J. Wygod



Mr. Martin J. Wygod is Chairman at WebMD Health Corp. and President at River Edge Farm, Inc. He is on the Board of Directors at San Diego Cancer Research Institute and Webmd Health Foundation, Inc. Mr. Wygod was previously employed as Chairman by Emdeon Corp., Chairman & Acting Chief Executive Officer by HLTH Corp., and Chairman by Porex Corp.



Transactions


Date
Shares
Transaction
Value





03/25/2017
14,592


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $50.32 per share.


734,270


12/22/2016
14,321


 
Disposition at $55 per share.


787,655


12/16/2016
8,697


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $51.16 per share.


444,939


12/07/2016
4,290


 
Disposition at $53.66 per share.


230,202


12/06/2016
40,710


 
Disposition at $53.49 per share.


2,177,578


12/05/2016
50,000


 
Disposition at $53.24 per share.


2,662,000


11/21/2016
23,656


 
Disposition at $53.85 per share.


1,273,876


11/18/2016
136,982


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $53.95 per share.


7,390,179


11/18/2016
175,000


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $29.44 per share.


5,152,000


11/18/2016
14,406


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $53.95 per share.


777,204


11/18/2016
16,666


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $38.65 per share.


644,140


11/18/2016
29,879


 
Disposition at $53.93 per share.


1,611,375


11/17/2016
36,308


 
Disposition at $54 per share.


1,960,632


11/02/2016
25,000


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


11/02/2016
25,000


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


07/20/2016
26,146


 
Gift at $0 per share.


0


07/20/2016
4,000


 
Gift at $0 per share.


0


05/06/2016
12,040


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $62.41 per share.


751,417


12/18/2015
8,697


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $46.26 per share.


402,324


05/08/2015
13,955


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $44.44 per share.


620,161


03/25/2015
60,000


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


02/11/2015
8,802


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $38.98 per share.


343,102


09/16/2014
15,595


 
Disposition at $48.5 per share.


756,358


09/16/2014
2,030


 
Disposition at $48.5 per share.


98,455


08/19/2014
26,000


 
Gift at $49.75 per share.


1,293,500


08/19/2014
20,000


 
Gift at $49.75 per share.


995,000


08/18/2014
20,081


 
Disposition at $48.19 per share.


967,704


08/15/2014
15,000


 
Disposition at $48.21 per share.


723,150


08/14/2014
20,500


 
Disposition at $47.79 per share.


979,695


08/13/2014
53,789


 
Disposition at $47.84 per share.


2,573,266


08/13/2014
142,584


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $48.06 per share.


6,852,588


08/13/2014
175,000


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $29.44 per share.


5,152,000


08/12/2014
40,630


 
Disposition at $47.93 per share.


1,947,396


08/12/2014
136,210


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $48.06 per share.


6,546,253


08/12/2014
180,000


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $23.61 per share.


4,249,800


08/11/2014
76,027


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $47.84 per share.


3,637,132


08/11/2014
106,656


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $19.11 per share.


2,038,196


07/14/2014
12,200


 
Gift at $51.5 per share.


628,300


06/27/2014
9,784


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $48.54 per share.


474,916


05/08/2014
13,045


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $41.02 per share.


535,106


02/11/2014
8,916


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $44.72 per share.


398,724


12/18/2013
50,000


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


11/01/2013
14,350


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $34.13 per share.


489,766


09/06/2013
15,500


 
Disposition at $32.96 per share.


510,880


09/05/2013
46,017


 
Disposition at $32.9 per share.


1,513,960


08/14/2013
58,500


 
Disposition at $33.31 per share.


1,948,635


08/13/2013
76,745


 
Disposition at $33.2 per share.


2,547,934


07/26/2013
22,772


 
Gift at $0 per share.


0


07/26/2013
22,772


 
Gift at $0 per share.


0


06/28/2013
9,028


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $29.37 per share.


265,153


05/23/2013
47,500


 
Gift at $0 per share.


0


05/08/2013
75,000


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


03/28/2013
5,637


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $24.32 per share.


137,092





        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. Martin J. Wygod 
Chairman




Dr. Steven L. Zatz 
President, Chief Executive Officer & Director




Mr. Blake  DeSimone 
Chief Financial Officer & Executive VP




Mr. Rick  Treese 
Chief Technology Officer




Mr. Adam  Dublin 
Senior Vice President-Strategy & Analytics




Mr. Lewis H. Leicher 
Senior Vice President




Mr. Anthony  Vuolo 
Senior Vice President




Mr. Ian Godwin Banwell 
Director




Ms. Risa  Fisher 
Head-Investor Relations




Mr. Adam  Grossberg 
Chief Communications Officer




Ms. Kathleen  Tourjee 
Vice President-Human Resources




Mr. Douglas W. Wamsley 
Secretary, Executive VP & Co-General Counsel




Mr. Michael B. Glick 
Executive Vice President & Co-General Counsel




Mr. Stanley S. Trotman 
Independent Director




Mr. James V. Manning 
Independent Director




Mr. Neil F. Dimick 
Independent Director




Dr. Mark J. Adler 
Independent Director




Dr. Kristiina  Vuori 
Independent Director




Mr. William J. Marino 
Independent Director




Mr. Joseph E. Smith 
Independent Director
















Log In




1:49 AM EDT
July 29, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:34aBREAKINGElon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range
12:21aTesla: Standard Model 3 will cost $35,000, long-range model will cost $44,000
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15
























































MARTIN J  WYGOD - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











MARTIN J  WYGOD
Check out list of companies and businesses related to MARTIN J  WYGOD. Find out MARTIN J  WYGOD address and contact details. View other people related to MARTIN J  WYGOD - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

C/O WEBMD HEALTH CORP. 111 EIGHTH AVENUE NEW YORK 10011 NY




Companies related to MARTIN J  WYGOD
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001326583WebMD Health Corp.Chairman of the Board 395 HUDSON STREET  NEW YORK 10014




MARTIN J  WYGOD on the Web
Persons related to MARTIN J  WYGOD - WebMD Health Corp.NamePositionCityMARK J MD  ADLERDirector ELMWOOD PARKMARK J MD  ADLERDirector NEW YORKMARK J MD  ADLERDirector NEW YORK,MARK J MD  ADLERDirector NEW YORKMARK J MD  ADLERDirector NEW YORKPeter  AnevskiExec VP and CFO NEW YORKPeter  AnevskiExec VP and CFO NEW YORKIAN  BANWELLDirector CHARLOTTEPAUL A  BROOKEDirector NEW YORKKevin M  CameronDirector ELMWOOD PARKKevin M  CameronDirector NEW YORKKevin M  CameronDirector NEW YORK,Kevin M  CameronDirector NEW YORKKevin M  CameronNEW YORKThomas Jason  ColemanDirector GREENWICHBlake  DeSimoneChief Financial Officer NEW YORKNEIL F  DIMICKDirector COSTA MESANEIL F  DIMICKDirector NEW YORKNEIL F  DIMICKDirector NEW YORKNEIL F  DIMICKELMWOOD PARKNEIL F  DIMICKDirector NEW YORKNan Kirsten  ForteExecutive VP-Consumer Services NEW YORKNan Kirsten  ForteExecutive VP-Consumer Services NEW YORK,Craig J  FroudeEVP-Health Services NEW YORKCraig J  FroudeEVP - Health Services NEW YORK,MARK D  FUNSTONExecutive VP and CFO NEW YORKDavid A  GangEVP - Product/Programming, CTO NEW YORKWAYNE T  GATTINELLACEO and President NEW YORKWAYNE T  GATTINELLACEO and President NEW YORK,WAYNE T  GATTINELLANEW YORK,Michael B  GlickExec VP and Co-General Counsel NEW YORKMichael B  GlickExec VP and Co-General Counsel NEW YORKMichael B  GlickNEW YORKRIVER LIMITED PARTNERSHIP  HIGHWHITE PLAINSHLTH CORP10% Owner ELMWOOD PARKCARL C  ICAHN10% Owner NEW YORKCARL C  ICAHN10% Owner NEW YORKICAHN PARTNERS LPWHITE PLAINSICAHN PARTNERS MASTER FUND II L.P.GRAND CAYMAN, CAYMAN ISLANDSICAHN PARTNERS MASTER FUND II L.P.WHITE PLAINSICAHN PARTNERS MASTER FUND III L.P.WHITE PLAINSICAHN PARTNERS MASTER FUND III L.P.GRAND CAYMAN, CAYMAN ISLANDSICAHN PARTNERS MASTER FUND III L.P.GEORGE TOWNICAHN PARTNERS MASTER FUND LPWHITE PLAINSICAHN PARTNERS MASTER FUND LPGEORGE TOWN, GRAND CAYMANJEROME C  KELLERDirector COLUMBIAJEROME C  KELLERDirector NEW YORKJEROME C  KELLERDirector NEW YORK,JEROME C  KELLERDirector NEW YORKKensico Associates LPGREENWICHKensico Capital, LLCGREENWICHKENSICO CAPITAL MANAGEMENT CORP10% Owner GREENWICHKensico Offshore Fund II Master Ltd.GREENWICHKensico Offshore Fund Master, Ltd.GREENWICHKensico Partners, L.P.GREENWICHMichael Bernard  LowensteinGREENWICHJAMES V  MANNINGDirector LANHAMJAMES V  MANNINGDirector NEW YORKJAMES V  MANNINGDirector NEW YORK,JAMES V  MANNINGDirector NEW YORKJAMES V  MANNINGDirector NEW YORKDavid C  MarekExecutive VP- Consumer Svces NEW YORKDavid C  MarekExecutive Vice President NEW YORKWILLIAM J  MARINODirector MOUNTAIN LAKESWILLIAM J  MARINODirector NEW YORKWILLIAM J  MARINODirector NEW YORKGregory A.  MasonNEW YORK,Gregory A.  MasonExecutive VP-Consumer Services NEW YORKAbdool Rahim MD  MoossaDirector NEW YORKAbdool Rahim MD  MoossaDirector NEW YORK,William Edward  Pence IVEVP, COO and CTO NEW YORKWilliam Edward  Pence IVEVP and CTO NEW YORK,William Edward  Pence IVEVP and CTO NEW YORKCavan M.  RedmondChief Executive Officer NEW YORKHERMAN  SARKOWSKYDirector NEW YORKHERMAN  SARKOWSKYDirector NEW YORK,HERMAN  SARKOWSKYDirector NEW YORKDavid S.  SchechterDirector NEW YORKDavid J  SchlangerChief Executive Officer NEW YORKDavid J  SchlangerChief Executive Officer NEW YORKJOSEPH E  SMITHDirector WOODCLIFF LAKEJOSEPH E  SMITHDirector NEW YORKJOSEPH E  SMITHDirector NEW YORK,JOSEPH E  SMITHDirector NEW YORKSOROS FUND MANAGEMENT LLCNEW YORKGEORGE  SOROSNEW YORKGEORGE  SOROSNEW YORKRobert  SorosNEW YORKRichard  TreeseExec VP and CTO NEW YORKSTANLEY S  TROTMAN JRDirector STANLEY S  TROTMAN JRDirector NEW YORKSTANLEY S  TROTMAN JRDirector NEW YORK,STANLEY S  TROTMAN JRDirector NEW YORKANTHONY  VUOLOExec VP & CFO NEW YORKANTHONY  VUOLOCOO and CFO NEW YORK,Kristiina MD  VuoriDirector NEW YORKDouglas W  WamsleyExec VP, Co-Gen Counsel & Secy NEW YORKDouglas W  WamsleyExecutive VP, General Counsel NEW YORK,Douglas W  WamsleyExec VP, Co-Gen Counsel & Secy NEW YORKWEBMD CORP /NEW/ELMWOOD PARKMARTIN J  WYGODChairman of the Board ELMWOOD PARKMARTIN J  WYGODChairman of the Board NEW YORKMARTIN J  WYGODChairman of the Board NEW YORK,MARTIN J  WYGODChairman of the Board NEW YORKSTEVEN L  ZATZChief Executive Officer ELMWOOD PARKSTEVEN L  ZATZPresident NEW YORKSTEVEN L  ZATZExecutive VP-Professional Svcs NEW YORK,STEVEN L  ZATZExecutive VP-Professional Svcs NEW YORK,STEVEN L  ZATZPresident NEW YORK
Potentially same personNameCityCountryMartin  JResearch Triangle ParkNCMartin  JDurhamNC












 





















Wygod, Martin J. - Dictionary definition of Wygod, Martin J. | Encyclopedia.com: FREE online dictionary
























      Skip to main content
    
















Search












Research categories





Research categories


Earth and Environment


History


Literature and the Arts


Medicine


People


Philosophy and Religion


Places


Plants and Animals


Science and Technology


Social Sciences and the Law


Sports and Everyday Life


Additional References







































Home

College & Higher Education Pathways

					
                      Economics magazines
        						
					
                      Wygod, Martin J.
        						
					
    	




























Print this article
Print all entries for this topic
Cite this article



        Tools 


Wygod, Martin J.
Business Leader Profiles for Students 
COPYRIGHT 2002 The Gale Group, Inc.




Wygod, Martin J.(1940-)
WebMD CorporationOverviewMartin J. "Marty" Wygod, chairman of the board of directors and CEO of the WebMD Corporation, is a financier and pharmaceutical executive who has developed a reputation as an incredibly savvy investor. He has often displayed a knack for anticipating investment fads and for turning huge profits on investments in a relatively short time. Throughout his career, Wygod has demonstrated a particular talent for buying small companies, merging them with other companies to form a new company, and then selling the conglomerate for enormous amounts of money.Personal LifeMartin J. Wygod was born in New York City in 1940. He graduated from New York University, in New York City, in 1961 with a BS degree in business administration. After graduating, he worked as a stockbroker on Wall Street. Later, he formed his own brokerage company, which he sold for $10 million when he was 29 years old. In the early 1970s, he ran his own merchant bank and he eventually entered the health care field in the 1980s, focusing on cost–containment services. In 1992, the Business Journal of New Jersey named Wygod as the most highly paid executive in New Jersey, based on his annual salary of $459,028 plus stock options.When Wygod was young, he developed a love for horses. As a teenager he walked horses at the racetracks at Belmont and Aqueduct. He is involved in racing, boarding and breeding thoroughbred horses, and is President 



of River Edge Farm, Inc., in Bedminster, New Jersey.Career DetailsFor Marty Wygod, it all started with a $20,000 seed fund given to him by his mother. Through subsequent investments and acquisitions, he turned that relatively modest gift into approximately $50 million by the 1980s.One of his early and profitable investments involved Computer Sciences Corporation. It was 1964 and computer technology was starting to develop and grow. Thus, Wygod believed that investors would soon be clamoring for computer software stocks. With that in mind, he put $75,000 into Computer Sciences. Wygod's instincts proved correct. By 1970, the investment returned a profit of $5 million. Wygod made himself even richer when he invested in the private stock of Computax, another computer company. When the company went public, the stock value increased from $10 to $100.The mid–1960s were an especially prosperous time for the young financier. When he was 26 years old, he started his own brokerage firm and, three years later, he sold it for $10 million. Even though he could have chosen not to work for the rest of his life, Wygod remained active. In the 1970s, he ran a merchant bank.It was during that period that he first became interested in health care investments. In 1977, he bought, along with fellow investors Bernie Marden and Albert Weiss, a controlling interest in Glasrock Medical Services, an Atlanta company that produced medical plastics. Wygod's initial investment of $2 million turned into $125 million when, in 1982, he sold most of his interest in the company, along with interest in another company to a British company. Wygod was only 43 years old, and yet he still entertained no thoughts about early retirement. Instead, he used his profits to start Porex Technologies in January 1983.By then, Wygod wanted to get into the mail–order prescription drug business. He had heard about National Pharmacies, a small, mail–order drug company that provided funded health benefit plans. National Pharmacies, he learned, had revenues of about $25 million and profits of about $400,000. Wygod also learned that it was part of financier Victor Posner's APL Corp. Wygod paid Posner $30 million in Porex stock and cash for it, and then set out to find business for his new company. He merged Porex with National Pharmacies to form Medco Containment Services Incorporated and, in six months, he had signed up several corporate–funded drug benefit plans, including those offered by Alcoa, General Motors and Georgia–Pacific.

Wygod based Medco in Fair Lawn, New Jersey, setting it up as a pharmacy–benefit management company focused on the sale of prescription medicines. With the help of financiers Michael Milken and Drexel Burnham, Medco's market value shot up to $290 million. (Eventually it would become a $2.6–billion company with a net income of $138 million.)Wygod became more firmly entrenched in health care after his 1985 acquisition of Paid Prescriptions from Computer Sciences Corporation. The move gave Medco access to a national network of 40,000 drugstores that accepted its health care card.By 1991, Medco had benefited from the robust growth of funded drug benefit plan coverage in the United States. In 1983, only about 5 percent of the population were covered. By the early 1990s, 40 percent were covered. Medco was mailing maintenance drugs through 900 funded benefit drug plans of corporations, unions, HMOs and state retirement systems. Also, it boasted of its exceptional service and lower prices. According to Forbes's Howard Rudnitsky, Medco "specialized in maintenance medication drugs," including prescriptions for "blood pressure, arthritis, diabetes, gastrointestinal problems and other chronic ailments." Rudnitsky added, "Medco claimed it was saving customers 20 percent or more" over retail pharmacy prices. At the time, "independent retail pharmacists and state pharmacy boards lobbied to restrict mail order drug services." However, they were unsuccessful.Chronology: Martin J. Wygod1940:   Born.1961:   Graduated from New York University.1964:   Invested in Computer Sciences Corp.1977:   Bought Glasrock Medical Services.1982:   Sold Glasrock for $125–million profit.1983:   Formed Medco Containment Services.

1992:   Sold Medco to Merck.1999:   Established CareInsite Incorporated.2000:   Became co–CEO of WebMD.2001:   Named chairman of the board of WebMD.To make itself even more attractive to customers, Medco created its Prescribers Choice program, which took its service to a higher level. Beyond the maintenance drugs, Medco, with the addition of the new program, was involved in therapeutic drug categories in which drugs



were priced at different levels. This is how the program worked: If a prescription for the more expensive brand of drug in those categories was mailed to Medco, while an equivalent drug could be prescribed at a lower price, then a Medco pharmacist notified the prescribing physician. Obviously, some major pharmaceutical companies were uncomfortable with the program. But others felt is was better than cost–containment programs run by HMOs that offered reimbursement for only one or two drugs prescribed for a condition.In 1992, Wygod made a deal with Merck and Company, a major pharmaceutical manufacturer, to buy Medco for $6.6 billion. As part of the deal, Wygod became a member of Merck's board of directors, and he continued running Medco. It turned out to be another sweet deal. When Wygod eventually left Merck toward the end of the decade, he took with him more than $250 million in stock and fees from the merger. The profit bought him a 100–acre ranch in Rancho Santa Fe, California.By 1994, nearly 33 million Americans were covered by Medco–administered drug benefit plans, and Medco had become more than just a mail–order company. The major retail pharmacy chains and most independent pharmacies were accepting Medco's benefit card. The card enabled the user to get his or her prescription filled for little or nothing. Medco reimbursed the retailer and charged the benefit plan at its discount rates.When Wygod left Merck, he became chairman of Synetic, an online medical company that subsequently merged with Medical Manager Corp. In May 1989, Wygod became chairman of the board of Medical Manager, a position he held until September 2000.In 1999, Wygod, together with a group of former Medco colleagues, helped establish CareInsite Inc., an Internet–based health care corporation. The aim of the web site was to provide physicians, pharmacists, and payers with an Internet–efficient method of accessing and exchanging medical information, as well as claims processing and information retrieval services. CareInsite automated and put online the rules that govern managed care and dictate treatments and drugs that doctors can provide to their patients. Essentially, it was an online Medco. He served as chairman of the board of CareInsite from 1999 until September 2000.

Wygod scheduled an IPO for June 1999, with the system set to debut in strategic locations including New York City in September. Before that happened, however, Merck went to court in February 1999 to stop the site's implementation. Wygod and his partners, Merck claimed, had signed non–competition agreements with Merck's Medco pharmacy benefit manager. Wygod countered that the agreement expired in May 1999 and filed his own suit in July 1999. It was Wygod's contention that Merck was out to eliminate competition.Despite Merck's lawsuit and the complexity of Wygod's business model, as well as the deeply troubled health care industry, CareInsite made it to the market. In February 2000, it was acquired by WebMD. As a result of other acquisitions and mergers, WebMD became the largest processor of electronic transactions in the health care industry. It was also the top consumer health care web portal as well as a leading provider of software services to physician offices.Wygod, who entered WebMD via CareInsite, served as co–chief executive officer of WebMD from September 2000 until October 2000, sharing the CEO reins with Jeffrey Arnold. Wygod became sole chief executive of the Atlanta–based WebMD when Arnold resigned. At the time, WebMD, like many dot.com companies formed in the late 1990s, began experiencing significant financial trouble. In May 1999, its stocks had reached a high of $105 a share. Soon after, though, the value plummeted. Wygod took over at a time when WebMD required massive restructuring because of substantial overlap created when WebMD acquired several companies. Besides CareInsite, these companies included Envoy, Medical Manager, and OnHealth Network. The overhaul resulted in the company laying off more than 1,000 employees and eliminating many of its costly strategic alliances. The company said the restructuring could help it save about $250 million by the fourth quarter of 2001.The restructuring plan included two phases. The first phase involved WebMD consolidating its offices and data centers, reducing marketing and promotional expenses, and eliminating redundant positions. The second phase involved consolidating sales forces and focusing on customer service, generating revenue, and eliminating non–strategic and non–profitable products and contracts.In April 2001, Wygod was appointed chairman of the board of WebMD. He remained the company's CEO. He was confident the he and WebMD would finally be able to pull off what others couldn't: a profitable e–health enterprise. Wygod's goals, according to BusinessWeek Online, included "constructing tight digital links between insurers, doctors, and patients. Analysts said the measures could possibly save WebMD at least $50 billion in processing and other back–office costs."One of the ways Wygod and WebMD hoped to get out of the red was to offer a new piece of technology: a hand–held device for doctors. The company would charge between $250 and $400 per month for a service that doctors can use to perform tasks that would include writing prescriptions, conducting lab inquiries, and monitoring billing.Social and Economic ImpactWhenever anyone goes to the pharmacy to fill a prescription, and they present a card that provides them with a substantial discount, they are benefiting, in part, by



Martin Wygod's involvement in the health care industry and cost–containment practices. Wygod helped revolutionize medical billing when he got into the mail order prescription business in the 1980s. As chairman and CEO of Medco, Wygod turned the company into a major player in the mail–order prescription drug industry.Besides making a great deal of money with his investment strategies, Wygod, in the process, essentially transformed the drug distribution business when he created Medco Containment Services, which was an intermediary between health plans and pharmacies. Medco administered the health plan's rules for prescribing medication. As a result, it saved the payers' money by monitoring doctor's prescriptions and indicated when less expensive drugs were available and appropriate.Sources of InformationContact at: WebMD Corporation
669 River Dr., Ctr. 2
Elmwood Park , NJ 07407
Business Phone: (201) 703–3400
URL: http://www.webmd.comBibliographyBarrett, Amy, "Marty Wygod Stuns Health–Care Industry—Again," BusinessWeek Online. 15 February 2000. Available at http://www.businessweek.com/bwdaily.Burroughs, Don L., "Merck's Medicine Man." U.S. News and World Report. 21 February 1994.Businessweek.com, "Marty Wygod," Business Week Online. 14 May 2001. Available at http://www.businessweek.com/magazine/content.Rudnitsky, Howard, "Drugs by Mail." Forbes. 15 April 1991.Rudnitsky, Howard "There's Plenty for Everyone." Forbes. 11 February 1985.







Cite this article 

Pick a style below, and copy the text for your bibliography.
            





                        MLA
                    



                        Chicago



                        APA
                    





                        
                        "Wygod, Martin J.."
                        
                            Business Leader Profiles for Students.
                        .
                        
                        Encyclopedia.com.
                        29 Jul. 2017
                        <http://www.encyclopedia.com>.
                    



                        
                        "Wygod, Martin J.." 
                            Business Leader Profiles for Students.
                        
                        . Encyclopedia.com.
                        (July 29, 2017). 
                            http://www.encyclopedia.com/education/economics-magazines/wygod-martin-j




                        
                        "Wygod, Martin J.." 
                            Business Leader Profiles for Students.
                        
                        . Retrieved
                        July 29, 2017
                        from Encyclopedia.com: 
                            http://www.encyclopedia.com/education/economics-magazines/wygod-martin-j







Learn more about citation styles 




Citation styles

									Encyclopedia.com gives you the ability to cite reference entries and articles according to common styles from the Modern Language Association (MLA), The Chicago Manual of Style, and the American Psychological Association (APA).
								

									Within the “Cite this article” tool, pick a style to see how all available information looks when formatted according to that style.  Then, copy and paste the text into your bibliography or works cited list.
								

									Because each style has its own formatting nuances that evolve over time and not all information is available for every reference entry or article, Encyclopedia.com cannot guarantee each citation it generates.  Therefore, it’s best to use Encyclopedia.com citations as a starting point before checking the style against your school or publication’s requirements and the most-recent information available at these sites:
								

Modern Language Association
http://www.mla.org/style
The Chicago Manual of Style
http://www.chicagomanualofstyle.org/tools_citationguide.html
American Psychological Association
http://apastyle.apa.org/

Notes:


										Most online reference entries and articles do not have page numbers.  Therefore, that information is unavailable for most Encyclopedia.com content.  However, the date of retrieval is often important.  Refer to each style’s convention regarding the best way to format page numbers and retrieval dates.
									

										In addition to the MLA, Chicago, and APA styles, your school, university, publication, or institution may have its own requirements for citations.  Therefore, be sure to refer to those guidelines when editing your bibliography or works cited list. 
									































































































Martin J. Wygod - Wikipedia





















 






Martin J. Wygod

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Martin Wygod


Born
(1940-02-01) February 1, 1940 (age 77)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Residence
Rancho Santa Fe, California


Education
New York University


Occupation
Stockbroker, entrepreneur, merchant banker, racehorse owner/breeder


Known for
Founder: Medco Containment Services, Inc.


Board member of
WebMD Health Corporation,
HLTH Corporation,
Del Mar Thoroughbred Club


Spouse(s)
Pamela S.


Children
Emily, Max


Martin J. Wygod (born February 1, 1940) is an American businessman and a prominent Thoroughbred racehorse owner/breeder.



Contents


1 Business career
2 Thoroughbred racing
3 References
4 External links



Business career[edit]
A business administration graduate from New York University, he joined a Wall Street stock brokerage firm before becoming a managing partner in a similar firm.
In 1964, Wygod became involved with Computer Sciences Corporation (CSC) in California, run by founders Roy Nutt and Fletcher Jones. In the 1970s he shifted his focus to the burgeoning health care industry, buying Glasrock Medical Services in 1977 and after five years of solid growth, sold it for a large profit. In 1983 he established Medco Containment Services, Inc. and built it into the largest mail order pharmacy in the United States. In 1993 Wygod sold Medco to Merck & Co. for more than US$6 billion.
Martin Wygod is currently Chairman of the New York City based WebMD Health Corporation which provides health information services to consumers, healthcare professionals, physicians, employers, and health plans through its public and private online portals. As well, Wygod is Chairman of HLTH Corporation, an Elmwood Park, New Jersey technology company providing healthcare information services.
Thoroughbred racing[edit]
Since boyhood, Martin Wygod has had a love of horses and the sport of Thoroughbred Horse racing. Growing up in New York he spent time as a hot walker at Belmont Park and Aqueduct Racetrack. As a result of his friendship with Fletcher Jones of CSC, Wygod first became a Thoroughbred owner when Jones gave him two racehorses, Verification and Heliotropic, as a 25th birthday gift. Fletcher Jones owned Westerly Stud Farms near Santa Ynez, California and was involved in horse racing for several years prior to his untimely death in 1972.
Since 1975 the Wygods have owned the 240-acre (0.97 km2) River Edge Farm near Buellton in the Santa Ynez Valley.[1] In 1995, they left the East Coast of the United States to make their home on a 110-acre (0.45 km2) estate in Rancho Santa Fe, California. A member of The Jockey Club, Martin Wygod and his wife Pamela began devoting more time to their horses and became major players in Thoroughbred racing. Their River Edge Farm was the leading breeder in California in 2006, 2007 and 2008.
In 1996 Martin Wygod became a trustee of the Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association and serves on the Board of Directors of the Del Mar Thoroughbred Club. Pamela Wygod also oversees two foundations, the Rose Foundation and the WebMD Health Foundation. They are supporters of Breeders' Cup Charities
Lefty Nickerson was the first trainer hired to condition Wygod's horses for racing. One of their early stakes race wins came in the 1973 Derby Trial with the colt, Settecento. As of 2009, their trainer is John Shirreffs. Other successful racehorses raced by Martin and Pamela Wygod include:

Exotic Wood (b. 1992) - won G1s Go For Wand Handicap, Santa Monica Handicap, Santa Maria Handicap
Tranquility Lake (b. 1995) - multiple Grade 1 winner and successful broodmare for the Wygods. Her 2004 colt (later named Jalil) sired by Storm Cat was sold at the September 2005 Keeneland Sales for $9.7 million
Sweet Catomine (b. 2002) - American Champion Two-Year-Old Filly. Won 2004 Breeders' Cup Juvenile Fillies
After Market (b. 2003) - son of Tranquility Lake. Won four straight graded stakes including back-to-back Grade 1s, the Charles Whittingham Memorial and Eddie Read Handicaps
Life Is Sweet (b. 2005) - in 2009 won the G1 Breeders' Cup Ladies' Classic and Santa Margarita Invitational Handicap

References[edit]



^ Wesch, Hank (14 September 2005). "Wygods sell colt for $9.7 million". U-T San Diego. 



External links[edit]

Martin Wygod at the NTRA
Martin Wygod at WebMD





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Martin_J._Wygod&oldid=717426805"					
Categories: 1940 birthsLiving peopleAmerican financial businesspeopleAmerican racehorse owners and breedersPeople from New York CityAmerican JewsStockbrokersHidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 27 April 2016, at 16:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









WBMD.COM | Our Company | Our Board of Directors | Martin J. Wygod 
















Martin J. Wygod
Chairman of the Board of Directors

Martin J. Wygod has, since May 2005, served as Chairman of the Board of WebMD.  From March 2001 until our merger with HLTH Corporation, our former parent company, in October 2009, Mr. Wygod served as HLTH's Chairman of the Board and served as a member of its Board of Directors from September 2000 until the HLTH merger.  Mr. Wygod also served as HLTH's Acting Chief Executive Officer from February 2008 until the HLTH merger and as its Chief Executive Officer from September 2000 until May 2003.  He is also engaged in the business of racing and breeding thoroughbred horses.






Privacy Policy
Contact Us
Career Opportunities












Martin J Wygod - Lompoc, CA | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Martin J Wygod in Lompoc, CA


Martin J Wygod

                                                                           Intelius found that Martin J Wygod  is  a male between 70 and 80 years old from Lompoc, CA.  We have connected them to
                19 addresses,
                10 phones,
                and 2 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Age

Martin J Wygod is in his 70s

Martin Has Lived In

Lompoc, CA
Rancho Santa Fe, CA
Buellton, CA

Martin's Relatives

Pamela Wygod
Max Wygod







Martin J Wygod



Zodiac SignAquarius



GenderMale



Professional Status
Chairman at WebMD Inc



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Martin? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Martin, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Martin J Wygod
Get a Criminal Check on Martin J Wygod
Get a Public Record Report on Martin J Wygod
Get a People Search Report on Martin J Wygod


Martin J Wygod's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Martin J Wygod has lived as well as Martin J Wygod's phone numbers and email addresses.




Martin J Wygod Has Lived in 5 States
California Address for Martin J Wygod


750 N E C* 

Lompoc, CA


Has Lived In

Lompoc, CA
Rancho Santa Fe, CA


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Martin J Wygod

(201) ***-**** - Elmwood Park, NJ 
(212) ***-**** - New York, NY 
(805) ***-**** - Schaghticoke, NY 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Martin J Wygod

m*****w@***.com
m*****1@***.net
m**********d@***.com


Get Email Report




Martin J Wygod's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Martin J Wygod's academic history.  Find out which schools Martin J Wygod attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Martin J Wygod received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Martin J Wygod Has Attended 1 School
New York University 


Martin J Wygod's Professional Information
Information regarding Martin J Wygod's professional history.  Find out previous places Martin J Wygod has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Martin J Wygod Has Worked at 12 Places
Company: WebMD Inc
               Title: Chairman
Company: WebMD Inc
               Title: Chief Executive Officer
Martin J Wygod's Experience
Title: Chairman
               Company: WebMD Inc
Job Details
               Company Size: $500 mil to less than $1 bil - Employee Range: 1,000 to less than 5,000. WebMD Health Corp. is the leading provider of health information services, serving consumers, physicians, healthcare professionals, employers, and health plans through our public and private online portals, mobile platforms and health-focused publications. The WebMD Health Network includes WebMD Health, Medscape, MedicineNet, eMedicineHealth, RxList, Medscape Education and other owned WebMD sites.
Title: Chief Executive Officer
               Company: WebMD Inc
Job Details
               WebMD Health Corp. is the leading provider of health information services, serving consumers, physicians, healthcare professionals, employers, and health plans through our public and private online portals, mobile platforms and health-focused publications. The WebMD Health Network includes WebMD Health, Medscape, MedicineNet, eMedicineHealth, RxList, Medscape Education and other owned WebMD sites.
Additional Professional Information on Martin J Wygod

 See Martin J Wygod's LinkedIn Profile



Martin J Wygod's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Martin J Wygod


Martin J Wygod's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Martin J Wygod's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Martin Wygod
Username Matches

                  MartinWygod
                  WygodMartin
                  Martin.Wygod
                  Wygod.Martin
                  Martin_Wygod
                  Wygod_Martin
                  Martin-Wygod
                  Wygod-Martin
                  MWygod
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
M Wygod







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.














Martin J. Wygod - Wikipedia





















 






Martin J. Wygod

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Martin Wygod


Born
(1940-02-01) February 1, 1940 (age 77)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Residence
Rancho Santa Fe, California


Education
New York University


Occupation
Stockbroker, entrepreneur, merchant banker, racehorse owner/breeder


Known for
Founder: Medco Containment Services, Inc.


Board member of
WebMD Health Corporation,
HLTH Corporation,
Del Mar Thoroughbred Club


Spouse(s)
Pamela S.


Children
Emily, Max


Martin J. Wygod (born February 1, 1940) is an American businessman and a prominent Thoroughbred racehorse owner/breeder.



Contents


1 Business career
2 Thoroughbred racing
3 References
4 External links



Business career[edit]
A business administration graduate from New York University, he joined a Wall Street stock brokerage firm before becoming a managing partner in a similar firm.
In 1964, Wygod became involved with Computer Sciences Corporation (CSC) in California, run by founders Roy Nutt and Fletcher Jones. In the 1970s he shifted his focus to the burgeoning health care industry, buying Glasrock Medical Services in 1977 and after five years of solid growth, sold it for a large profit. In 1983 he established Medco Containment Services, Inc. and built it into the largest mail order pharmacy in the United States. In 1993 Wygod sold Medco to Merck & Co. for more than US$6 billion.
Martin Wygod is currently Chairman of the New York City based WebMD Health Corporation which provides health information services to consumers, healthcare professionals, physicians, employers, and health plans through its public and private online portals. As well, Wygod is Chairman of HLTH Corporation, an Elmwood Park, New Jersey technology company providing healthcare information services.
Thoroughbred racing[edit]
Since boyhood, Martin Wygod has had a love of horses and the sport of Thoroughbred Horse racing. Growing up in New York he spent time as a hot walker at Belmont Park and Aqueduct Racetrack. As a result of his friendship with Fletcher Jones of CSC, Wygod first became a Thoroughbred owner when Jones gave him two racehorses, Verification and Heliotropic, as a 25th birthday gift. Fletcher Jones owned Westerly Stud Farms near Santa Ynez, California and was involved in horse racing for several years prior to his untimely death in 1972.
Since 1975 the Wygods have owned the 240-acre (0.97 km2) River Edge Farm near Buellton in the Santa Ynez Valley.[1] In 1995, they left the East Coast of the United States to make their home on a 110-acre (0.45 km2) estate in Rancho Santa Fe, California. A member of The Jockey Club, Martin Wygod and his wife Pamela began devoting more time to their horses and became major players in Thoroughbred racing. Their River Edge Farm was the leading breeder in California in 2006, 2007 and 2008.
In 1996 Martin Wygod became a trustee of the Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association and serves on the Board of Directors of the Del Mar Thoroughbred Club. Pamela Wygod also oversees two foundations, the Rose Foundation and the WebMD Health Foundation. They are supporters of Breeders' Cup Charities
Lefty Nickerson was the first trainer hired to condition Wygod's horses for racing. One of their early stakes race wins came in the 1973 Derby Trial with the colt, Settecento. As of 2009, their trainer is John Shirreffs. Other successful racehorses raced by Martin and Pamela Wygod include:

Exotic Wood (b. 1992) - won G1s Go For Wand Handicap, Santa Monica Handicap, Santa Maria Handicap
Tranquility Lake (b. 1995) - multiple Grade 1 winner and successful broodmare for the Wygods. Her 2004 colt (later named Jalil) sired by Storm Cat was sold at the September 2005 Keeneland Sales for $9.7 million
Sweet Catomine (b. 2002) - American Champion Two-Year-Old Filly. Won 2004 Breeders' Cup Juvenile Fillies
After Market (b. 2003) - son of Tranquility Lake. Won four straight graded stakes including back-to-back Grade 1s, the Charles Whittingham Memorial and Eddie Read Handicaps
Life Is Sweet (b. 2005) - in 2009 won the G1 Breeders' Cup Ladies' Classic and Santa Margarita Invitational Handicap

References[edit]



^ Wesch, Hank (14 September 2005). "Wygods sell colt for $9.7 million". U-T San Diego. 



External links[edit]

Martin Wygod at the NTRA
Martin Wygod at WebMD





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Martin_J._Wygod&oldid=717426805"					
Categories: 1940 birthsLiving peopleAmerican financial businesspeopleAmerican racehorse owners and breedersPeople from New York CityAmerican JewsStockbrokersHidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 27 April 2016, at 16:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Martin J. Wygod - Wikipedia





















 






Martin J. Wygod

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Martin Wygod


Born
(1940-02-01) February 1, 1940 (age 77)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Residence
Rancho Santa Fe, California


Education
New York University


Occupation
Stockbroker, entrepreneur, merchant banker, racehorse owner/breeder


Known for
Founder: Medco Containment Services, Inc.


Board member of
WebMD Health Corporation,
HLTH Corporation,
Del Mar Thoroughbred Club


Spouse(s)
Pamela S.


Children
Emily, Max


Martin J. Wygod (born February 1, 1940) is an American businessman and a prominent Thoroughbred racehorse owner/breeder.



Contents


1 Business career
2 Thoroughbred racing
3 References
4 External links



Business career[edit]
A business administration graduate from New York University, he joined a Wall Street stock brokerage firm before becoming a managing partner in a similar firm.
In 1964, Wygod became involved with Computer Sciences Corporation (CSC) in California, run by founders Roy Nutt and Fletcher Jones. In the 1970s he shifted his focus to the burgeoning health care industry, buying Glasrock Medical Services in 1977 and after five years of solid growth, sold it for a large profit. In 1983 he established Medco Containment Services, Inc. and built it into the largest mail order pharmacy in the United States. In 1993 Wygod sold Medco to Merck & Co. for more than US$6 billion.
Martin Wygod is currently Chairman of the New York City based WebMD Health Corporation which provides health information services to consumers, healthcare professionals, physicians, employers, and health plans through its public and private online portals. As well, Wygod is Chairman of HLTH Corporation, an Elmwood Park, New Jersey technology company providing healthcare information services.
Thoroughbred racing[edit]
Since boyhood, Martin Wygod has had a love of horses and the sport of Thoroughbred Horse racing. Growing up in New York he spent time as a hot walker at Belmont Park and Aqueduct Racetrack. As a result of his friendship with Fletcher Jones of CSC, Wygod first became a Thoroughbred owner when Jones gave him two racehorses, Verification and Heliotropic, as a 25th birthday gift. Fletcher Jones owned Westerly Stud Farms near Santa Ynez, California and was involved in horse racing for several years prior to his untimely death in 1972.
Since 1975 the Wygods have owned the 240-acre (0.97 km2) River Edge Farm near Buellton in the Santa Ynez Valley.[1] In 1995, they left the East Coast of the United States to make their home on a 110-acre (0.45 km2) estate in Rancho Santa Fe, California. A member of The Jockey Club, Martin Wygod and his wife Pamela began devoting more time to their horses and became major players in Thoroughbred racing. Their River Edge Farm was the leading breeder in California in 2006, 2007 and 2008.
In 1996 Martin Wygod became a trustee of the Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association and serves on the Board of Directors of the Del Mar Thoroughbred Club. Pamela Wygod also oversees two foundations, the Rose Foundation and the WebMD Health Foundation. They are supporters of Breeders' Cup Charities
Lefty Nickerson was the first trainer hired to condition Wygod's horses for racing. One of their early stakes race wins came in the 1973 Derby Trial with the colt, Settecento. As of 2009, their trainer is John Shirreffs. Other successful racehorses raced by Martin and Pamela Wygod include:

Exotic Wood (b. 1992) - won G1s Go For Wand Handicap, Santa Monica Handicap, Santa Maria Handicap
Tranquility Lake (b. 1995) - multiple Grade 1 winner and successful broodmare for the Wygods. Her 2004 colt (later named Jalil) sired by Storm Cat was sold at the September 2005 Keeneland Sales for $9.7 million
Sweet Catomine (b. 2002) - American Champion Two-Year-Old Filly. Won 2004 Breeders' Cup Juvenile Fillies
After Market (b. 2003) - son of Tranquility Lake. Won four straight graded stakes including back-to-back Grade 1s, the Charles Whittingham Memorial and Eddie Read Handicaps
Life Is Sweet (b. 2005) - in 2009 won the G1 Breeders' Cup Ladies' Classic and Santa Margarita Invitational Handicap

References[edit]



^ Wesch, Hank (14 September 2005). "Wygods sell colt for $9.7 million". U-T San Diego. 



External links[edit]

Martin Wygod at the NTRA
Martin Wygod at WebMD





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Martin_J._Wygod&oldid=717426805"					
Categories: 1940 birthsLiving peopleAmerican financial businesspeopleAmerican racehorse owners and breedersPeople from New York CityAmerican JewsStockbrokersHidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 27 April 2016, at 16:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Martin J. Wygod   Wikipedia | 2017 Martin Wygod Net Worth














masnews.orgHome
RSSaudiology ceus continuing education at audiologyonlineaudiocodes 420hd failed to validate server uc lobbyaudiology for school nurses in californiaaudit ar assertions and procedures flashcards quizletaudit costs allowable see administrative requirementsmonitoringauditaudi a4 170 tdi diesel particulate filter problemsauctions in this weeks wisconsin state farmeraudaexplore introduces total loss vehicle valuation systemaudi triumphs with diesel power at sebringaudit programs are designed with dualaudition for zee tv upcoming serialauditing data changes in the entity framework part 2audit_trail parameter tips oracle consulting oracleauditing failed logins in sql serverauditions for rockettes summer intensive held inauditions announced for thoroughly modern millie at connecticut theatre companyauditory hallucinations interview guide promoting recovery with anaudit readiness 6 impairment of trade receivablesaudit techniques guide credit for increasing research activities ie research tax credit research credit issuesauditing data changes in the entity framework part 1Martin J. Wygod - WikipediaMartin J. Wygod (born February 1, 1940) is an American businessman and a 
prominent Thoroughbred racehorse owner/breeder.en.wikipedia.orgFounders Stepping Aside As WebMD Troubles Grow - The New ...Oct 13, 2000 ... Martin J. Wygod, whose dreams are more concerned with profits, took full ... Mr. 
Clark, for example, has about 3 percent of WebMD stock, worth $102 ... exclusive 
of good will and other accounting charges -- not a net loss.www.nytimes.comIcahn's $40 Million WebMD Sale - Barron'sSep 23, 2013 ... WebMD Chairman Martin J. Wygod sold 247,455 shares for $8,346,731. ... in 
selling pretty significant stakes, it's definitely worth being mindful.www.barrons.comWho are the wealthiest county residents? - The San Diego Union ...Sep 24, 2011 ... That includes Microsoft co-founder Bill Gates, whose $59 billion net worth ranks 
him ahead of all the other billionaires who make up this year's ...www.sandiegouniontribune.comWayback Machine: Sarkowsky's platinum touch | Sportspress ...Mar 3, 2015 ... Said Martin J. Wygod, chairman of WebMD: “Herman enriched Seattle .... it's 
important to them that you know their financial worth, but Herman ...sportspressnw.com2006 - William P. Barrett... and WebMD chairman Martin Wygod (Informer), Forbes, October 30, 2006, p.. 
36. ... puts net worth at just $250 million) (Informer), Forbes, October 2, 2006, p.www.williampbarrett.comThe last days of Drexel Burnham | Fortune.comOct 16, 2015 ... ... personable bankers like Martin Siegel, who had made a name for ... then worth 
only about $400,000—a pittance even by the standards of the ...fortune.comVFC_2012-13_Annual Report 3-29-14.inddMar 29, 2014 ... Net Assets at Beginning of Year: ... Net of expenses, Voices for Children's 
combined special events income ..... Pamela and Martin Wygod.3gqf9sypfje48yl873yltlq1-wpengine.netdna-ssl.comWebMD Health Corp.: NASDAQ:WBMD quotes & news - Google ...Martin J. Wygod, Chairman of the Board. Age: 77. Bio & Compensation - Reuters 
Trading Activity - Yahoo Finance. Steven L. Zatz M.D., President, Chief ...www.google.comIan G. Banwell Joins WebMD's Board of DirectorsJan 13, 2017 ... Martin J. Wygod, Chairman of the Board of WebMD, said: "Mr. Banwell brings to 
our Board his broad experience over 30 years as an investor ...www.prnewswire.commartin wygod net worth
Recent News Search100 arrested during truck event in terre hautejohn hussman net worthgame of thrones season 2 episode 6 watch onlineproblema para actualizar itunes en windows 10early action question college confidential 2017grantchester cast season 1aplikasi pangkalan data murid apdmgreg frady baseball camps showcasesspiritual meaning of 555 intuitive journal angel number 555is acapulco safe for americansarkansas lottery scholarship requirements in direis it possible to get rid of the hump on my necksunday school lessons for 2015 ezekiel 8deped memorandum order october 2015 results8 great tuesday s lineup releasedTag CloudLynn MassachusettsCleveland OhioTampa FloridaYoungstown OhioSeattle WashingtonHonolulu HawaiiFresno CaliforniaHouston TexasAugusta-Richmond County GeorgiaCharlotte North CarolinaBloomington MinnesotaSpringfield MassachusettsWauwatosa WisconsinLakewood OhioPalatine IllinoisCincinnati OhioSandy UtahRockford IllinoisRedmond WashingtonLakeland FloridaClearwater FloridaMoore OklahomaReturn to top of pageCopyright © 2017 ·  Genesis Framework · WordPress · Log in









Martin Wygod Net Worth | Martin J. Wygod   Wikipedia 2017














Home
RSS?wordfence_logHuman=1&hid=C3D100671262DAFA7D9E8D5C2809779A&r=0.20805888191587546breach of contract business caseback to school giveaway today in marionjared kushner sister dara kushnerinterlochen summer camp staff handbookessay on republic day in kannada languagebrazos valley troupe visits carls cornerscat williams net worthdownload ncert solutions for cbse class 9th all subjectsreinhard bonnke net worthkellogg racial equity grant fundfatal car accident in wisconsin yesterdaygcuf hec scholarship list 2017abc family freeform 25 days of christmasscholarships for women floridaminecraft armor generator minecraft command sciencequien es angel del villar el de los corridosmlb game matchup report statfox sportsscreen superheroes and the 8 terrible actors whocentral sector scholarship 2017 16 fresh circularscholarships karnatakakentucky state university national alumni associationtexas attorney general child visitation calendarwho will win american ninja warrior2017 mah jongg card downloadmartin wygod net worthMartin J. Wygod - WikipediaMartin J. Wygod (born February 1, 1940) is an American businessman and a 
prominent Thoroughbred racehorse owner/breeder.en.wikipedia.orgFounders Stepping Aside As WebMD Troubles Grow - The New ...Oct 13, 2000 ... Martin J. Wygod, whose dreams are more concerned with profits, took full ... Mr. 
Clark, for example, has about 3 percent of WebMD stock, worth $102 ... exclusive 
of good will and other accounting charges -- not a net loss.www.nytimes.comIcahn's $40 Million WebMD Sale - Barron'sSep 23, 2013 ... WebMD Chairman Martin J. Wygod sold 247,455 shares for $8,346,731. ... in 
selling pretty significant stakes, it's definitely worth being mindful.www.barrons.comWho are the wealthiest county residents? - The San Diego Union ...Sep 24, 2011 ... That includes Microsoft co-founder Bill Gates, whose $59 billion net worth ranks 
him ahead of all the other billionaires who make up this year's ...www.sandiegouniontribune.comWayback Machine: Sarkowsky's platinum touch | Sportspress ...Mar 3, 2015 ... Said Martin J. Wygod, chairman of WebMD: “Herman enriched Seattle .... it's 
important to them that you know their financial worth, but Herman ...sportspressnw.com2006 - William P. Barrett... and WebMD chairman Martin Wygod (Informer), Forbes, October 30, 2006, p.. 
36. ... puts net worth at just $250 million) (Informer), Forbes, October 2, 2006, p.www.williampbarrett.comThe last days of Drexel Burnham | Fortune.comOct 16, 2015 ... ... personable bankers like Martin Siegel, who had made a name for ... then worth 
only about $400,000—a pittance even by the standards of the ...fortune.comVFC_2012-13_Annual Report 3-29-14.inddMar 29, 2014 ... Net Assets at Beginning of Year: ... Net of expenses, Voices for Children's 
combined special events income ..... Pamela and Martin Wygod.3gqf9sypfje48yl873yltlq1-wpengine.netdna-ssl.comWebMD Health Corp.: NASDAQ:WBMD quotes & news - Google ...Martin J. Wygod, Chairman of the Board. Age: 77. Bio & Compensation - Reuters 
Trading Activity - Yahoo Finance. Steven L. Zatz M.D., President, Chief ...www.google.comIan G. Banwell Joins WebMD's Board of DirectorsJan 13, 2017 ... Martin J. Wygod, Chairman of the Board of WebMD, said: "Mr. Banwell brings to 
our Board his broad experience over 30 years as an investor ...www.prnewswire.com
Lastest NewsOddly around the worldWhat Makes a Woman "Wifey" Material, According to MenIf You Display These 10 Traits, You Might Be a Boring PersonIncredible shots from world's largest photo contestEPA Fuel Economy Variance Worst Performers: Real-world fuel economy losersWe Tried Giada De Laurentiis' Genius Cheese HackIf you laugh at these dark jokes, you’re probably a geniusPrince William: Diana would have been a 'nightmare grandmother'Husband of the Year Feeds Elderly Wife Ice Cream in 98-Degree HeatIn photos: The best of the animal world2018 Rolls-Royce Phantom First Look: Power meets presence2018 Subaru WRX First Test ReviewPopuplar Newsdemers street near in or arlington main your eyes full movie free watchexcept in the case of presidenthow to recover deleted photos from android phone_fire station near college gate elementarypch 50k dream car sweepstakestwitter help center reactivating your accountautozone near me oklahoma city somerville massachusettssamsung galaxy s iii mini resethotels 550 taylor avenue annapolis md 21401 near mecatholic church in nags head ncsome of the most haunted places in the worldbest catholic church in los angeleswhere women rule and mirrors are weaponscan you see the northern lights in norwaywhat is it like to be blind and deafchoose the best surge protectornet worth of ice princeare there moderncastles chigagp near me hurst texashow old is louise pattersonwhat are the muscles of the legapartments 1stcolonial road in virginia beach near meReturn to top of pageCopyright © 2017 ·  Genesis Framework · WordPress · Log in


